Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1061.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1208. Verification of citizenship.A commission shall, in all procedures and processes, affirmatively and adequately assess whether an applicant is a citizen of the United States when determining if the applicant is a qualified elector upon receiving a voter registration application.Section 2. Sections 1321, 1706 and 1901(a) of Title 25 are amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819 § 1321. Methods of voter registration.(a) Registration.--An individual qualified to register to vote under section 1301(a) (relating to qualifications to register) may apply to register as follows[:] upon presentation of documentary proof of United States citizenship with the application:(1) Under section 1322 (relating to in-person voter registration).(2) Under section 1323 (relating to application with driver's license application).(3) Under section 1324 (relating to application by mail).(4) Under section 1325 (relating to government agencies).(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "documentary proof of United States citizenship" shall mean any of the following:(1) A form of identification issued consistent with the requirements of Division B of the Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act for Defense, the Global War on Terror, and Tsunami Relief, 2005 (Public Law 109-13, 119 Stat. 231) that indicates the applicant is a citizen of the United States.(2) A valid United States passport.(3) The applicant's official United States military identification card, together with a United States military record of service showing that the applicant's place of birth was in the United States.(4) A valid government-issued photo identification card issued by a Federal, state or tribal government showing that the applicant's place of birth was in the United States.20250HB1061PN1156 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) A valid government-issued photo identification card issued by a Federal, state or tribal government other than an identification described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4), but only if presented together with one or more of the following:(i) A certified birth certificate issued by a state, a unit of local government in a state or a tribal government which:(A) was issued by the state, unit of local government or tribal government in which the applicant was born;(B) was filed with the office responsible for keeping vital records in the state;(C) includes the full name, date of birth and place of birth of the applicant;(D) lists the full names of one or both of the parents of the applicant;(E) has the signature of an individual who is authorized to sign birth certificates on behalf of the state, unit of local government or tribal government in which the applicant was born;(F) includes the date that the certificate was filed with the office responsible for keeping vital records in the state; and(G) has the seal of the state, unit of local government or tribal government that issued the birth certificate.(ii) An extract from a United States hospital record of birth created at the time of the applicant's birth which indicates that the applicant's place of birth was 20250HB1061PN1156 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the United States.(iii) A final adoption decree showing the applicant's name and that the applicant's place of birth was in the United States.(iv) A consular report of birth abroad of a citizen of the United States or a certification of the applicant's report of birth of a United States citizen issued by the Secretary of State.(v) A naturalization certificate or certificate of citizenship issued by the Secretary of Homeland Security or any other document or method of proof of United States citizenship issued by the Federal Government under 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12 (relating to immigration and nationality).(vi) An American Indian Card issued by the Department of Homeland Security with the classification "KIC."§ 1706. Duties under part.(a) Offense defined.--Any commissioner, registrar, clerk, inspector of registration, commission officer, commission assistant, commission employee, individual, partnership or corporation that intentionally delays, neglects or refuses to perform a duty imposed by this part commits a misdemeanor of the second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $5,000 or to imprisonment for not more than two years, or both.(b) Private right of action.--(1) A person may bring a civil cause of action based upon a violation of section 1208 (relating to verification of citizenship) in an appropriate court for declaratory or injunctive relief with respect to the violation.20250HB1061PN1156 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The court may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees, including litigation expenses and damages up to $10,000 for each individual violation of section 1208.§ 1901. Removal of electors.(a) Removal of elector's registration record.--Commissions shall institute a program to protect the integrity of the electoral process and to ensure the maintenance of accurate and current registration records. The program shall be uniform, nondiscriminatory and in compliance with the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-110, 42 U.S.C. § 1973 et seq.). An elector's registration shall not be canceled except as follows:(1) At the request of the elector.(2) Upon the death of the elector under section 1505 (relating to death of registrant).(3) Upon confirmation that the elector has moved to a residence outside the county.(4) Under a voter removal program as provided for under subsection (b), and in compliance with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-31, 42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq.).(5) Upon indication, investigation and verification that an elector is not a citizen of the United States.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1061PN1156 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324